nb: Award justere (personlig) inkludert: Blank (ingen personlig tilpasning); Egendefinert tekst inkludert; Egendefinert tekst valgfritt; Logo/grafikk inkludert; Navneskilt inkludert; Fortrykt (standard); Annet
bg-BG: Включено е персонализиране на наградата: Празна (без персонализиране); Включва персонализиран текст; Опционален персонализиран текст; Включва лого/графика; Включва табелка с име; Предварително отпечатана (стандартна); Друго
ja: 賞品のカスタマイズ付き: 無地 (パーソナライゼーションなし); カスタムテキスト込み; カスタムテキスト (オプション); ロゴ・グラフィック込み; ネームプレート込み; 印刷済み (標準); その他
ru: Включенная персонализация награды: Пустая (без персонализации); Пользовательский текст включен; Пользовательский текст по выбору; Логотип или графика включены; Табличка с именем включена; Предварительно напечатанная (стандартная); Другое
vi: Bao gồm tùy chỉnh giải thưởng: Trống (không cá nhân hóa); Bao gồm văn bản tùy chỉnh; Tùy chọn văn bản tùy chỉnh; Bao gồm logo/hình ảnh; Bao gồm bảng tên; In sẵn (tiêu chuẩn); Khác
ro-RO: Personalizare certificat inclusă: Gol (fără personalizare); Text personalizat inclus; Text personalizat opțional; Siglă/grafică inclusă; Plăcuță cu nume inclusă; Preimprimat (standard); Altele
fr: Options de personnalisation incluses avec le trophée: Vierge (sans personnalisation); Texte personnalisé inclus; Texte personnalisé en option; Logo/graphique inclus; Plaque nominative incluse; Pré-imprimé (standard); Autre
tr: Dahil olan ödül kişiselleştirmesi: Boş (kişiselleştirme yok); Özel metin dahil; Özel metin isteğe bağlı; Logo/grafik dahil; İsimlik dahil; Önceden basılı (standart); Diğer
nl: Personalisatie award inbegrepen: Blanco (geen personalisatie); Inclusief aangepaste tekst; Aangepaste tekst optioneel; Inclusief logo/afbeelding; Inclusief naamplaatje; Voorgedrukt (standaard); Overige
es: Personalización del premio incluida: En blanco (sin personalización); Texto personalizado incluido; Texto personalizado opcional; Logo/gráfico incluido; Placa identificativa incluida; Preimpreso (estándar); Otra
hr-HR: Uključena prilagodba nagrade: Prazno (bez personalizacije); Uključen je prilagođeni tekst; Opcionalan prilagođeni tekst; Uključen je logotip/grafika; Uključena je pločica s imenom; Unaprijed otisnuto (standardno); Ostalo
lt-LT: Įtrauktas apdovanojimų pritaikymas: Tuščia (be asmeninio pritaikymo); Pridedamas pasirinktinis tekstas; Pasirinktinis tekstas (pasirinktinai); Pridedamas logotipas / grafika; Pridedama vardinė lentelė; Iš anksto atspausdintas (standartinis); Kita
pt-BR: Personalização do prêmio incluída: Em branco (sem personalização); Texto personalizado incluído; Texto personalizado opcional; Logo/gráfico incluído; Placa de identificação incluída; Pré-impresso (padrão); Outro
ko: 포함된 상장/상패 맞춤 설정: 공백(개인화 없음); 사용자 지정 텍스트 포함; 사용자 지정 텍스트 선택 사항; 로고/그래픽 포함; 명판 포함; 사전 인쇄됨(표준); 기타
sl-SI: Vključeno je prilagajanje priznanja: Prazno (brez prilagojenosti); Vključeno besedilo po meri; Besedilo po meri izbirno; Vključen logotip/grafika; Vključena napisna ploščica; Vnaprej natisnjeno (standardno); Drugo
en: Award customization included: Blank (no personalization); Custom text included; Custom text optional; Logo/graphic included; Nameplate included; Pre-printed (standard); Other
da: Præmietilpasning inkluderet: Blank (ingen personlig tilpasning); Tilpasset tekst inkluderet; Tilpasset tekst valgfri; Logo/grafik inkluderet; Navneskilt inkluderet; Fortrykt (standard); Andet
zh-CN: 奖项包含个性化定制: 空白（无个性化内容）; 包含自定义文本; 自定义文本可选; 包含 logo/图形; 包含铭牌; 预印刷（标准）; 其他
th: มีการปรับแต่งรางวัลรวมอยู่: ว่างเปล่า (ไม่มีการปรับให้เหมาะกับแต่ละบุคคล); รวมข้อความที่กำหนดเอง; มีตัวเลือกข้อความที่กำหนดเอง; รวมโลโก้/กราฟิก; รวมป้ายชื่อ; พิมพ์สำเร็จรูป (มาตรฐาน); อื่นๆ
pl: Personalizacja nagrody w zestawie: Puste (brak personalizacji); Zawiera tekst niestandardowy; Opcjonalny tekst niestandardowy; Zawiera logo/grafikę; Zawiera tabliczkę z imieniem; Z nadrukiem (standardowe); Inne
sv: Anpassningar som ingår: Tom (ingen personanpassning); Anpassad text ingår; Anpassad text valfritt; Logotyp/grafik ingår; Namnskylt ingår; Förtryckt (standard); Annat
pt-PT: Personalização do prémio incluída: Em branco (sem personalização); Texto personalizado incluído; Texto personalizado opcional; Logótipo/gráfico incluído; Placa de identificação incluída; Pré-impresso (standard); Outros
sk-SK: Príspôsobenie ocenenia v cene: Prázdne (bez personalizácie); Vrátane vlastného textu; Vlastný text voliteľný; Vrátane loga/grafiky; Vrátane menovky; Predtlačené (štandard); Iné
de: Anpassung der Auszeichnung inklusive: Leer (keine Personalisierung); Inklusive benutzerdefiniertem Text; Benutzerdefinierter Text optional; Inklusive Logo/Grafik; Inklusive Namensschild; Vorgedruckt (Standard); Sonstige
hu: Tartalmazza a díj testreszabását: Üres (nincs személyre szabás); Egyéni szöveg biztosítva; Egyéni szöveg opcionális; Logót/grafikát tartalmaz; Névtáblát tartalmaz; Előre nyomtatott (szabványos); Egyéb
fi: Palkinnon personointi sisältyy hintaan: Tyhjä (ei personointia); Sisältää mukautetun tekstin; Mukautettu teksti valinnainen; Sisältää logon/grafiikan; Sisältää nimikyltin; Esipainettu (vakio); Muu
cs: Možnost přizpůsobení ocenění v ceně: Prázdné (bez personalizace); Vlastní text v ceně; Vlastní text volitelně; Logo/grafika v ceně; Štítek se jménem v ceně; Předtištěné (standardní); Ostatní
it: Personalizzazione premio inclusa: Neutro (nessuna personalizzazione); Testo personalizzato incluso; Testo personalizzato opzionale; Logo/grafica inclusa; Targhetta inclusa; Prestampato (standard); Altro
el: Περιλαμβάνεται προσαρμογή βραβείου: Κενό (χωρίς εξατομίκευση); Περιλαμβάνεται προσαρμοσμένο κείμενο; Προαιρετικό προσαρμοσμένο κείμενο; Περιλαμβάνεται λογότυπο/γραφικό; Περιλαμβάνεται πινακίδα ονόματος; Προεκτυπωμένο (τυπικό); Άλλο
zh-TW: 包含獎項自訂: 空白 (無個人化); 包含自訂文字; 可選自訂文字; 包含標誌/圖形; 包含名牌; 預先印製 (標準); 其他